California, session 20252026, AB2633.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21625 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21625. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to curtail the dissemination of stolen property and to facilitate the recovery of stolen property by means of a uniform, statewide, state-administered program of regulation of persons whose principal business is the buying, selling, trading, auctioning, or taking in pawn of tangible personal property and to aid the State Board of Equalization to detect possible sales tax evasion.Further, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to require the uniform statewide reporting of tangible personal property acquired by persons whose principal business is the buying, selling, trading, auctioning, or taking in pawn of tangible personal property, unless the property or the transaction is specifically exempt herein, for the purpose of correlating these reports with other reports of city, county, and city and county law enforcement agencies and further utilizing the services of the Department of Justice to aid in tracing and recovering stolen property.Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that this article shall not be superseded or supplanted by the provisions of any ordinance or charter of any city, county, or city and county.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 21626 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21626. (a) A “secondhand dealer,” as used in this article, means and includes any person, copartnership, firm, or corporation whose business includes buying, selling, trading, taking in pawn, accepting for sale on consignment, accepting for auctioning, or auctioning secondhand tangible personal property. A “secondhand dealer” does not include participants at gun shows or events, shows, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, who are not required to be licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code, who are acting in compliance with the requirements of Sections 26500 to 26585, inclusive, and 27545 of the Penal Code, and who are not a “Gun Show Trader,” as described in Sections 16620 and 26525 of the Penal Code.(b) Every entity acting as a secondhand dealer by engaging in any of the actions described in subdivision (a) shall have a valid California secondhand dealer’s license issued under Section 21641.(c) Every entity acting as a secondhand dealer as described in subdivision (a) shall report to the California Pawn and SecondhandDealer System, operated by the Department of Justice as defined in Justice, pursuant to Section 21628.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 21627 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21627. (a) As used in this article, “tangible personal property” means all secondhand tangible personal property that bears a serial number or personalized initials or inscription or that, at the time it is acquired by the secondhand dealer, bears evidence of having had a serial number or personalized initials or inscription.(b) “Tangible personal property” also means the following:(1) All tangible personal property, new or used, including motor vehicles, received in pledge as security for a loan by a pawnbroker.(2) All tangible personal property that bears a serial number or personalized initials or inscription and that is purchased by a secondhand dealer or a pawnbroker or that, at the time of the purchase, bears evidence of having had a serial number or personalized initials or inscription.(3) All tangible personal property that the Attorney General statistically determines through the most recent Department of Justice crime data, updated pursuant to Section 13010 of the Penal Code, to constitute a significant class of stolen goods. A list of that personal property shall be supplied by the Attorney General to all local law enforcement agencies and posted on the Attorney General’s internet website. That list shall be updated annually by the Attorney General, beginning January 1, 2016, to ensure that it addresses current problems with stolen goods.(4) All secondhand jewelry, items, or objects.(c) As used in this article, “tangible personal property” does not include any new goods or merchandise purchased from a bona fide manufacturer or distributor or wholesaler of the new goods or merchandise by a secondhand dealer. For the purposes of this article, however, a secondhand dealer shall retain for one year from the date of purchase, and shall make available for inspection by any law enforcement officer, any receipt, invoice, bill of sale, or other evidence of purchase of the new goods or merchandise.(d) As used in this article, “tangible personal property” does not include coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, silver, or other precious metals. “Commercial grade ingots” means 0.99 fine or finer ingots of gold, silver, palladium, or platinum, or 0.925 fine sterling silver art bars and medallions, provided that the ingots, art bars, and medallions are marked by the refiner or fabricator as to their assay fineness.(e)For purposes of this article, a “significant class of stolen goods” means those items determined through the Department of Justice’s most recent OpenJustice Web portal update to constitute more than 10 percent of property reported stolen in the calendar year preceding the annual posting of the list of significant classes of stolen goods.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 21628 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21628. (a) Every secondhand dealer described in Section 21626 shall report daily, or no later than the next business day excluding weekends and holidays after receipt or purchase of secondhand tangible personal property, except for firearms, to the California Pawn and SecondhandDealer System (CAPSS), all secondhand tangible personal property, except for firearms, they have purchased, taken in trade, taken in pawn, accepted for sale on consignment, or accepted for auctioning, in accordance with Section 21630 and this section. The report shall be legible, prepared in English, completed where applicable, and include the information specified in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), as applicable.(1) (A) A property description. The property description shall be a complete and reasonably accurate description of the property, including, but not limited to, the following: serial number, personalized inscriptions, and other identifying marks or symbols, owner-applied numbers, the size, color, material, and, if known by the secondhand dealer, the manufacturer’s pattern name. The property description shall include the brand and model name or number of the item if known to, or reasonably ascertainable by, the secondhand dealer. The property description shall include a plain text description of the item generally accepted by the secondhand industry. Watches need not be disassembled when special skill or special tools are required to obtain the required information, unless specifically requested to do so by a peace officer. A special tool does not include a penknife, caseknife, or similar instrument and disassembling a watch with a penknife, caseknife, or similar instrument does not constitute a special skill. In all instances in which the required information may be obtained by removal of a watchband, then the watchband shall be removed. The cost associated with opening the watch shall be borne by the pawnbroker, secondhand dealer, or customer.(B) A secondhand dealer shall utilize in the article field either an article field descriptor, the format of which shall be provided by the Department of Justice, or a properly spelled and non-abbreviated plain text descriptor commonly recognized and utilized by the pawn and secondhand dealer industry. The lack of an article field descriptor provided by the Department of Justice shall not be relevant to any determination as to whether the secondhand dealer has received evidence of authority to sell or pledge the property pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) so long as the secondhand dealer reports an article field descriptor consistent with this subdivision.(C) In the case of the receipt or purchase of a handheld electronic device by a secondhand dealer, the serial number reported pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be the International Mobile Station Equipment Identity (IMEI), the mobile equipment identifier (MEID), or other unique identifying number assigned to that device by the device manufacturer. If none of these identifying numbers are available by the time period required for reporting pursuant to this subdivision, the report shall be updated with the IMEI, MEID, or other unique identifying number assigned to that device by the device manufacturer as soon as reasonably possible but no later than 10 working days after receipt or purchase of the handheld electronic device.(D) For the purpose of this paragraph, “handheld electronic device” means any portable device that is capable of creating, receiving, accessing, or storing electronic data or communications and includes, but is not limited to, a cellular phone, smartphone, or tablet.(2) A report submitted by a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall be deemed to have been accepted by the Department of Justice if a good faith effort has been made to supply all of the required information. An error or omission on the report shall be noted, and the reporting pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall be notified of the error or omission by the Department of Justice. A reporting pawnbroker or secondhand dealer shall have three business days from that notice to amend or correct the report before being subject to any enforcement violation.(b) (1) When a secondhand dealer complies with this section, they shall be deemed to have received from the seller or pledger adequate evidence of authority to sell or pledge the property for all purposes included in this article, and Division 8 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Financial Code.(2) In enacting this subdivision, it is the intent of the Legislature that its provisions shall not adversely affect the implementation of, or prosecution under, any provision of the Penal Code.(c) Any person who conducts business as a secondhand dealer at any gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, outside the jurisdiction that issued the secondhand dealer license in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 21641, may be required to submit a duplicate of the transaction report prepared pursuant to this section to the local law enforcement agency where the gun show or event is conducted.(d) (1) The Department of Justice shall recognize and accept the properly spelled and non-abbreviated plain text property descriptors generally accepted in the pawn and secondhand industries provided by pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, as has been the longstanding practice of chiefs of police and sheriffs when they had received paper reports from pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers.(2) A report required of a secondhand dealer pursuant to this section shall be transmitted by electronic means to CAPSS by the secondhand dealer.(3) Unless specifically identified in this section, the Department of Justice, chiefs of police, and sheriffs shall not require a secondhand dealer to include any additional information concerning the seller, the pledger, or the property received by the secondhand dealer in the report required by this section.(4) If there is a future change to the reporting requirements of CAPSS that substantively alters the reporting standards provided by this article, those changes shall be implemented and operated in compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). In implementing and operating a future change to CAPSS, the Department of Justice, chiefs of police, and sheriffs shall comply with Sections 21637 and 21638. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice shall not take any action with respect to the implementation, operation, or maintenance of CAPSS required by this chapter by adoption of an emergency regulation.(5) On or before July 1, 2017, the Department of Justice shall convene a meeting with the Department of Technology to discuss issues pertaining to any proposed changes or upgrades to CAPSS required by this chapter. The Department of Technology may provide technological assistance for ongoing improvements, updates, or changes to CAPSS required by this chapter, as requested.(6) A transaction shall consist of not more than one item.(7) For purposes of this subdivision, “item” shall mean any single physical article. However, with respect to a commonly accepted grouping of articles that are purchased as a set, including, but not limited to, a pair of earrings or place settings of china, silverware, or other tableware, “item” shall mean that commonly accepted grouping.(8) This subdivision does not exempt a secondhand dealer from the fingerprinting requirement of this section.(e) (1) Each secondhand dealer, as defined in Section 21626, shall record and maintain the identification of the intended seller or pledger for three years from the date the item was reported to CAPSS. The identification of the seller or pledger of the property shall be verified by the person taking the information, who may use technology, including, but not limited to, cameras or software, or both, to obtain information and verify identity remotely. The verification shall be valid if the person taking the information reasonably relies on any one of the following documents, provided that the document is currently valid or has been issued within five years and contains a photograph or description, or both, of the person named on it, and, where applicable, is signed by the person, and bears a serial or other identifying number:(A) A passport of the United States.(B) A driver’s license issued by any state or Canada.(C) An identification card issued by any state.(D) An identification card issued by the United States.(E) A passport from any other country in addition to another item of identification bearing an address.(F) A Matricula Consular, in addition to another item of identification bearing an address.(2) Each secondhand dealer, as defined in Section 21626, shall also record and maintain a certification by the intended seller or pledger that the person is the owner of the property or has the authority of the owner to sell or pledge the property, and a legible fingerprint taken from the intended seller or pledger.(3) (A) If local law enforcement notifies the secondhand dealer, pursuant to Section 21647 of this code or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1407) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, that the item from the intended seller or pledger has been reported lost, stolen, or embezzled, the secondhand dealer shall provide law enforcement the information recorded as required by this subdivision immediately upon request or no later than the next business day.(B) The required fields on CAPSS, that would otherwise be used to identify the intended seller or pledger of the property, shall instead be populated by “on file,” and the information on that person’s identity shall be recorded and maintained as required by this subdivision.(f)  This section does not exempt a person licensed as a firearms dealer pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code from the reporting requirements for the delivery of firearms pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, of the Penal Code.(g)  This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 21630 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21630. (a) A secondhand dealer shall electronically transmit to CAPSS no later than the next business day after the date of transaction excluding weekends and holidays or, if not then possible due to an electrical, telecommunications, or other malfunction, as soon as reasonable thereafter, the report of acquisition of tangible personal property as required by Section 21628.(b) Notwithstanding Section 21628, submission of a tangible property acquisition report is not required if the report of an acquisition of the same property from the same customer has been submitted within the preceding 12 months.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. Section 21631 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21631. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all tangible personal property that is found in the shop of a pawnbroker or secondhand dealer doing business under a California secondhand dealer’s license shall be reported as required under subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 21628, including any additional information required by Section 21628 that is known by the reporting person, and shall be held as required under Section 21636. If no claim is made for the property for a period of 60 days after it is reported, the pawnbroker, secondhand dealer, or coin dealer may treat the property as property regularly acquired in the due course of business.SEC. 6.SEC. 7. Section 21634 of the Business and Professions Code is repealed.SEC. 7.SEC. 8. Section 21636 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21636. (a) Every secondhand dealer shall retain in their possession for a period of 30 days all firearms reported under Section 21628.2. The 30-day holding period with respect to firearms shall commence with the date the report of its acquisition was made electronically to the Department of Justice by the secondhand dealer. The Department of Justice may for good cause authorize prior disposition of any firearms described in a specific report, provided that a secondhand dealer who disposes of firearms pursuant to that authorization shall report the sale thereof to the Department of Justice.(b) During the 30-day holding period specified in subdivision (a), every secondhand dealer shall produce any firearm reported under Section 21628.2 for inspection by any peace officer or employee designated by the Department of Justice.(c) Firearms subject to inspection as specified in subdivision (b) and firearms held in pawn that are stored off the business premises of the licensee shall, upon request for inspection, be produced at the licensee’s business premises within one business day of a request.(d) Any person who conducts business as a secondhand dealer at any gun show or event, as defined in Section 478.100 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or its successor, outside the jurisdiction that issued the secondhand dealer license in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 21641, may be required to submit for inspection, as specified in subdivision (b), any firearm acquired at a gun show or event within 48 hours of the request of the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the gun show or event was conducted at a location specified by the local law enforcement agency.SEC. 8.SEC. 9. Section 21636.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21636.1. (a) Every secondhand dealer shall retain in his or her possession for a period of seven days all tangible personal property, as defined in Section 21627, reported pursuant to Sections 21628 and 21630. The seven-day holding period with respect to tangible personal property shall commence with the date the report of its acquisition was made to CAPSS.(b) During the seven-day holding period specified in subdivision (a), every secondhand dealer shall produce any tangible personal property reported pursuant to Sections 21628 and 21630 for inspection by any peace officer or employee designated by the local licensing authority or the Department of Justice.(c) Tangible personal property subject to inspection as specified in subdivision (b) and all tangible personal property held in pawn that is stored off the business premises of the licensee shall, upon request for inspection, be produced at the licensee’s business premises within one business day of a request by the local licensing authority or the Department of Justice.(d) (1) If five days have elapsed since the transmission of the report of acquisition pursuant to Section 21628 or 21630, the remainder of the seven-day hold specified in subdivision (a) shall not apply to any tangible personal property sold by the secondhand dealer if the following are present:(A) The secondhand dealer has recorded the sale in its book of records.(B) The record of sale includes:(i) The name of the buyer to whom the tangible personal property was sold.(ii) The buyer’s address.(iii) At least one of the following:(I) The buyer’s telephone number.(II) The buyer’s email address.(III) The buyer’s electronic address for receiving text messages.(2) In documenting the record of sale as set forth in paragraph (1), the secondhand dealer shall record the information provided by the buyer and shall not have any duty to verify the accuracy of the information provided by the buyer.(3) The information collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be retained by the secondhand dealer for 21 days following the date of sale of the property by the secondhand dealer and shall be available for inspection by a local law enforcement agency during this period.(4) If a sale of property is made pursuant to this subdivision, and within 21 days of the sale a local law enforcement agency notifies the secondhand dealer that the property has been reported stolen, the record of the sale and all information contained therein shall be provided to that local law enforcement agency by the secondhand dealer upon written request by that agency.SEC. 9.SEC. 10. Section 21636.5 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21636.5. No secondhand dealer shall promise a seller of tangible personal property that the seller may repurchase property sold to the secondhand dealer.SEC. 10.SEC. 11. Section 21637 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21637. (a) Nothing herein contained in this section shall be deemed to excuse compliance with the provisions of any city, county, or city and county ordinance or any other state law pertaining to or covering the reporting, holding, or releasing of tangible personal property, not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, except that no city, county, or city and county or any other state agency shall adopt the following:(1) Holding, reporting, or identification requirements for transactions involving coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, silver, or other precious metals.(2) Identification, holding, or reporting requirements for the acquisition of tangible personal property, in the ordinary course of business, by pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, other than as set forth in Sections 21628, 21630, and 21636 of this code, and commencing July 1, 2010, Section 21628.2 of this code, and Section 21208 of the Financial Code.(b) No city, county, or city and county or any other state agency shall issue a license or permit to allow any entity to conduct business as a secondhand dealer without the entity having a state secondhand dealer license issued pursuant to Section 21641.(c) Any person conducting business as a secondhand dealer shall report receipt or purchase of secondhand tangible personal property to the California Pawn and SecondhandDealer System (CAPSS), operated by the Department of Justice, pursuant to Section 21628.SEC. 11.SEC. 12. Section 21638 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:21638. The provisions of this article shall not prohibit enactment, amendment, or enforcement by any city, county, or city and county of any local ordinance relating to a secondhand dealer that is not inconsistent with the provisions of this article, except that no city, county, or city and county, or any other state agency shall adopt the following:(a) Holding, reporting, or identification requirements for transactions involving coins, monetized bullion, or commercial grade ingots of gold, silver, or other precious metals.(b) Identification, holding, or reporting requirements for the acquisition of tangible personal property, in the ordinary course of business, by pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers, other than as set forth in Sections 21628, 21630, and 21636 of this code, and commencing July 1, 2010, Section 21628.2 of this code, and Section 21208 of the Financial Code.SEC. 12.SEC. 13. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.